Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-6840
Employment and wage data information; Department of Labor; duty.

The Department of Labor shall, as requested, provide to the director and the Tax Commissioner the employment and wage data information necessary to meet the responsibilities of the director and Tax Commissioner under the ImagiNE Nebraska Act, to the extent the Department of Labor collects such information.

Laws 2020, LB1107, § 40.